Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.205

Liability insurance for officials and employees.

Each city or town may purchase liability insurance with such limits as it may deem reasonable for the purpose of protecting its officials and employees against liability for personal or bodily injuries and property damage arising from their acts or omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their official duties.

[ 1973 c 125 s 2.]

NOTES:

Police dogs—Immunity: RCW 4.24.410.